Louisiana, session 2026, SB196.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:337.51(A)(1), the introductory paragraph of (2), and (3), and the
introductory paragraph of (B)(1), 337.53(C), the introductory paragraph of 1516.1(B) and
1516.1(B)(3), 1565(A) and (B), and 1625(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§337.51. Notice of assessment and right to appeal
A.(1) Having assessed the amount determined to be due, the collector shall
send a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the assessment is
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 196 ENROLLED
imposed at the address given in the last report filed by the taxpayer, or to any address
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from the United States Postal Service certified
software. This notice shall inform the taxpayer of the assessment and the right to do
any of the following:
(a) Pay the amount of the assessment within sixty ninety calendar days from
the date of the notice.
(b) Appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals for redetermination of the assessment
within sixty ninety calendar days from the date of the notice.
(c) Pay under protest in accordance with R.S. 47:337.63 within sixty ninety
calendar days from the date of the notice, and then either file suit or file a petition
with the Board of Tax Appeals, all as provided for in that Section.
(d) Agree in writing with the collector to a mediation within fifteen calendar
days from the date of the notice pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 47:337.51.1.
(2) If no report has been timely filed, the collector shall send a notice by
certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the assessment is imposed at any address
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from the United States Postal Service certified
software. This notice shall inform the taxpayer of the assessment and that he has
sixty ninety calendar days from the date of the notice to do any of the following:
* * *
(3) If the taxpayer has not paid under protest in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 47:337.63, or pursued an alternative remedy in accordance with
R.S. 47:337.64, or filed an appeal with the Board of Tax Appeals within the sixty
ninety-day period provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the assessment
shall be final and shall be collectible by distraint and sale as provided in this Part. If
an appeal for a redetermination of the assessment has been timely and properly filed,
the assessment shall not be collectible by distraint and sale until such time as the
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 196 ENROLLED
assessment has been redetermined or affirmed by the Board of Tax Appeals or the
court which last reviews the matter.
* * *
B.(1) If any dealer disputes any findings or assessment of the collector, he
may, within sixty ninety days of the receipt of notice of the assessment or finding,
do any of the following:
* * *
§337.53. Assessment and notice when tax is in jeopardy
* * *
C. The taxpayer against whom the assessment lies can stay distraint of his
property, or sale of his property already distrained, as the case may be, only by the
immediate payment of the assessment or by posting with the collector a surety bond
for twice the amount of such assessment, or of a lower amount acceptable to the
collector, with such sureties as the collector deems necessary. The taxpayer shall
have sixty ninety calendar days from the date of payment, or the date of posting
bond, to appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals for a redetermination of the assessment.
During this period, the collector shall hold any payment made in an escrow account.
If the taxpayer does not appeal, the collector shall immediately credit such payment
to tax collections or proceed to collect from sureties, if any were given. In the event
of an appeal, such payment or demand for payment from sureties given shall be held
in abeyance pending the redetermination or affirmation of the assessment by the
Board of Tax Appeals or the court which last reviews the matter. Final payment, or
collection from sureties, will be for the amount of the affirmed or redetermined
assessment.
* * *
§1516.1. In-state debt collection
* * *
B. Once an obligation has become collectible by distraint and sale, as
provided in this Chapter, the secretary shall send a notice to the taxpayer at the
address given in the last report filed by said the taxpayer, or to any address
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 196 ENROLLED
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software
informing him of the following:
* * *
(3) That if the debt is not paid within sixty ninety days of the date of the
notice, a collection fee not to exceed twenty-five percent of the total liability will be
charged to the account.
* * *
§1565. Notice of assessment and right to appeal
A. Having assessed the amount determined to be due, the secretary shall send
a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the assessment is imposed
at the address given in the last report filed by the taxpayer, or to any address
obtainable from any private entity which will provide such address free of charge or
from any federal, state, or local government entity, including but not limited to the
United States Postal Service or from United States Postal Service certified software.
However, if the notice is to be mailed to an address outside the United States, the
secretary shall send notice by First-Class Mail International with Electronic United
States Postal Service Delivery Confirmation. If no report has been timely filed, the
secretary shall send a notice by certified mail to the taxpayer against whom the
assessment is imposed at any address obtainable from any private entity which will
provide such address free of charge or from any federal, state, or local government
entity, including but not limited to the United States Postal Service or from United
States Postal service certified software. However, if the notice is to be mailed to an
address outside the United States, the secretary shall send notice by First-Class Mail
International with Electronic United States Postal Service Delivery Confirmation.
This notice shall inform the taxpayer of the assessment and that he has sixty ninety
calendar days from the date of the notice to either pay the amount of the assessment
or to appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals for a redetermination of the assessment. All
such appeals shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 17, Subtitle
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 196 ENROLLED
II of this Title.
B. If the taxpayer has not filed an appeal with the Board of Tax Appeals
within the sixty ninety day period, the assessment shall be final and shall be
collectible by distraint and sale as hereinafter provided. If an appeal for a
redetermination of the assessment has been filed, the assessment shall not be
collectible by distraint and sale until such time as the assessment has been
redetermined or affirmed by the Board of Tax Appeals or the court which last
reviews the matter.
* * *
§1625. Appeals from the collector's disallowance of refund claim
A.(1) If the collector fails to act on a properly filed claim for refund or credit
within one year from the date received by him or if the collector denies the claim in
whole or in part, the taxpayer claiming such the refund or credit may appeal to the
Board of Tax Appeals for a hearing on the claim filed. No appeal may be filed before
the expiration of one year from the date of filing such of the claim unless the
collector renders a decision thereon within that time, nor after the expiration of sixty
ninety days from the date of mailing by registered certified mail by the collector to
the taxpayer of a notice of the disallowance of the part of the claim to which such the
appeal relates.
(2) A taxpayer's proper appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals within sixty
ninety days from the date on any notice of disallowance issued shall also establish
that the appeal was filed within sixty ninety days from the date of certified or
registered mailing of the notice.
B. A notice of disallowance, if issued, shall inform the taxpayer that he has
sixty ninety days from the date of the certified or registered mailing of that notice
to appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals, and that any consideration, reconsideration,
or action by the collector with respect to such the claim following the mailing of a
notice by registered certified mail of disallowance shall not operate to extend the
period within which an appeal may be taken.
* * *
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 196 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be applicable to any notice mailed on or
after January 1, 2028.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.